src/fst/morphology/incoming/bop.lexc
LEXICON ira-suff
<0:÷ {´ира} 0:«VS»>		Des;

LEXICON isa-suff
<0:÷ {иса} 0:«VS»>		Des;

LEXICON uva-suff
<0:÷ {´ува} 0:«VS» paimp>	Des;

LEXICON ava-suff
<0:÷ {´ава} 0:«VS» paimp>	Des;

LEXICON va-suff
<0:÷ {ва} 0:«VS» paimp>		Des;

LEXICON a-suff
<0:÷ а 0:«VS» paimp>		Des;

LEXICON na-suff
<0:÷ {на} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] naimp> Des;

LEXICON Des
0:÷÷				DesTypes;

LEXICON DesTypes
<«NPast»>			NPastNT;
<«Imp»>				ImperfectNT;
<«Imper» 0:и>			ImperativeT;
<«Ger» 0:{ејки} raimp>		#;
<«Aor»>				AoristNT;
<«Pass» «Part» 0:{¬ен÷} rto>	PartT;
<«VSubst» 0:{¬ен÷} «Sg» 0:е raimp> #;

LEXICON NPastNT
<0:{и÷}>			NPastT;
<«Part» 0:{ещ÷} raimp>		PartT;

LEXICON ImperfectNT
<0:{ех÷}>			ImperfectT;
<«Part» 0:{ел÷}>		PartT;

LEXICON AoristNT
<0:{¬ох÷}>			AoristT;
<«Part» 0:{л÷}>			PartT;

LEXICON NPastT
<«1P» «Sg» 0:ъ>			#;
<«2P» «Sg» 0:ш>			#;
<«3P» «Sg» 0:ø>			#;
<«1P» «Pl» 0:м>			#;
<«2P» «Pl» 0:{т°е}>		#;
<«3P» «Pl» 0:{ът}>		#;

LEXICON ImperfectT
<«1P» «Sg» 0:ø> 		#;
<[«2P»|«3P»] «Sg» 0:е>		#;
<«1P» «Pl» 0:{м°е}>		#;
<«2P» «Pl» 0:{т°е}>		#;
<«3P» «Pl» 0:{°а}>		#;

LEXICON AoristT
<[«1P»|«2P»|«3P»] «Sg» 0:ø>	#;
<«1P» «Pl» 0:{м°е}>		#;
<«2P» «Pl» 0:{т°е}>		#;
<«3P» «Pl» 0:{°а}>		#;

LEXICON PartT
<«m» «Sg» 0:ø>			#;
<«f» «Sg» 0:а>			#;
<«n» «Sg» 0:о>			#;
<«Pl» 0:и>			#;

LEXICON ImperativeT
<«Sg»>				#;
<0:{÷т°е} «Pl»>			#;
